incubator/apertium-hi-ur.ur.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ابپتٹثجچحخدڈذرڑزژسشصضطظعغفقکگلمنوہ,ھءیےf</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"    c="Noun"/>

    <sdef n="m"    c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"    c="Feminine"/>

    <sdef n="sg"   c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"   c="Plural"/>

    <sdef n="nom"  c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="obl"  c="Oblique"/>
    <sdef n="voc"  c="Vocative"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="کلی__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="خط/ہ__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ے</l>
          <r>ہ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ے</l>
          <r>ہ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ے</l>
          <r>ہ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ہ</l>
          <r>ہ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r>ہ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r>ہ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="کو/ا__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ے</l>
          <r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ے</l>
          <r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ے</l>
          <r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ا</l>
          <r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="گدی__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="طبیعت__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="مربہ"><i>مرب</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گلوری"><i>گلوری</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آوارگی"><i>آوارگی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ٹوٹکا"><i>ٹوٹک</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="صفہ"><i>صف</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پھلواری"><i>پھلواری</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شجرہ"><i>شجر</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سنگھاڑا"><i>سنگھاڑ</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مسخرہ"><i>مسخر</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آٹا"><i>آٹ</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جھڑی"><i>جھڑی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سنگھہ"><i>سنگھ</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ڈگری"><i>ڈگری</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گھروندا"><i>گھروند</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="انگلی"><i>انگلی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کرتہ"><i>کرت</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دوسرا"><i>دوسر</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تفرقہ"><i>تفرق</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تتلی"><i>تتلی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="طوطا"><i>طوط</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بنگلہ"><i>بنگل</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="انگارا"><i>انگار</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مسکرانہ"><i>مسکران</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آلودگی"><i>آلودگی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جلیبی"><i>جلیبی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جیسا"><i>جیس</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="غصہ"><i>غص</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چھاتی"><i>چھاتی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ملبہ"><i>ملب</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نیلا"><i>نیل</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="حجرہ"><i>حجر</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دھانی"><i>دھانی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ٹانکا"><i>ٹانک</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کدہ"><i>کد</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بیچارا"><i>بیچار</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پانسہ"><i>پانس</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بیوی"><i>بیوی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خوشا"><i>خوش</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کاہنہ"><i>کاہن</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نالائقی"><i>نالائقی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تکا"><i>تک</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ولیمہ"><i>ولیم</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چوڑا"><i>چوڑ</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مورتی"><i>مورتی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="حرفی"><i>حرفی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گیرہ"><i>گیر</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خامی"><i>خامی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ہیجڑا"><i>ہیجڑ</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کلی"><i>کلی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گٹھلی"><i>گٹھلی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کنبہ"><i>کنب</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کھدرا"><i>کھدر</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دلچسپی"><i>دلچسپی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ڈوری"><i>ڈوری</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ٹھیکا"><i>ٹھیک</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تاریکی"><i>تاریکی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="روزنامچہ"><i>روزنامچ</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دوستی"><i>دوستی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="طبیعت"><i>طبیعت</i><par n="طبیعت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بدعہدی"><i>بدعہدی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کونا"><i>کون</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ڈنڈی"><i>ڈنڈی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="قضیہ"><i>قضی</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پوجا"><i>پوج</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کاپی"><i>کاپی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آسانی"><i>آسانی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چوکھٹا"><i>چوکھٹ</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چرچہ"><i>چرچ</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="برادری"><i>برادری</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="غلطی"><i>غلطی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بالشتیا"><i>بالشتی</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خاکی"><i>خاکی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پریشانی"><i>پریشانی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ہنڈی"><i>ہنڈی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بالا"><i>بال</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="میتھی"><i>میتھی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بھلائی"><i>بھلائی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پہاڑی"><i>پہاڑی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پلازہ"><i>پلاز</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کلیجی"><i>کلیجی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گھڑا"><i>گھڑ</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دھندہ"><i>دھند</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مٹکی"><i>مٹکی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ساڑی"><i>ساڑی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="انڈا"><i>انڈ</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آبادی"><i>آبادی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="فیروزہ"><i>فیروز</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بولی"><i>بولی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آندھی"><i>آندھی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پنجا"><i>پنج</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پتی"><i>پتی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نعرہ"><i>نعر</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دھمکی"><i>دھمکی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کمائی"><i>کمائی</i><par n="کلی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جرمانہ"><i>جرمان</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مردا"><i>مرد</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کشتی"><i>کشتی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="درمیانہ"><i>درمیان</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سینوری"><i>سینوری</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تالا"><i>تال</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="روٹی"><i>روٹی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کمینہ"><i>کمین</i><par n="خط/ہ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="رنگینی"><i>رنگینی</i><par n="گدی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ایکا"><i>ایک</i><par n="کو/ا__n"/></e>
